Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202048-3504
Waiver of right or protection under act prohibited.

An employer shall not require an employee or applicant to waive or limit any protection granted under the Workplace Privacy Act as a condition of continued employment or of applying for or receiving an offer of employment. Any agreement to waive any right or protection under the act is against the public policy of this state and is void and unenforceable.

Laws 2016, LB821, § 4.